Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-102.01
Insurance; service
contract excluded.

For purposes of Chapter 44,
insurance does not include a service
contract. For purposes of this section, service contract means (1)
a motor vehicle service contract as defined in section 44-3521 or (2) a contract
or agreement, whether designated as a service contract, maintenance agreement,
warranty, extended warranty, or similar term, whereby a person undertakes
to furnish, arrange for, or, in limited circumstances, reimburse for service,
repair, or replacement of any or all of the components, parts, or systems
of any covered residential dwelling or consumer product when such service,
repair, or replacement is necessitated by wear and tear, failure,
malfunction, inoperability, inherent defect, or failure of an inspection to detect the
likelihood of failure.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 91;

Laws 2011, LB535, § 10.